New Jersey, session 221, S2740.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The blueberry muffin is designated as the New Jersey State Muffin. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT This bill designates the blueberry muffin as the New Jersey State Muffin. New Jersey is the home of the commercial blueberry, which was first domesticated in Browns Mills in the early 20th century by Elizabeth White and Frederick Covile.  White and Coville accomplished this by selectively breeding the native highbush blueberry over the course of many years.  Blueberries now make up a significant proportion of New Jerseys agricultural economy and New Jersey is consistently among the top-five producers of blueberries in the nation, producing approximately 50 million pounds of blueberries worth an estimated $70 million annually. Blueberries taste good, are high in fiber, vitamin C, and antioxidants, are sodium and cholesterol-free, are low in calories, and may provide medical and health benefits, including helping to prevent cancer and heart disease.  Blueberry muffins are able to highlight both the healthfulness and the great taste of the blueberry, since they can be enjoyed as a high fiber breakfast food, or as a sweet dessert. It is therefore proper and fitting for the State of New Jersey to recognize the significance of the blueberry to the State and the delightful taste of the blueberry muffin by designating the blueberry muffin as the New Jersey State Muffin.